Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 4
MISCELLANEOUS

7-114-401. Deposit with state treasurer.

Assets of a dissolved corporation that should be transferred to a creditor, claimant, or shareholder of the corporation who cannot be found or who is not legally competent to receive them shall be reduced to cash and deposited with the state treasurer as property presumed to be abandoned under the provisions of article 13 of title 38, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 833, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.